Utah statutes.
63I-4-302.   Governor to require review of commercial activities.

Beginning with fiscal year 2009-10, the governor shall at least once every two fiscal years:

(1)  select at least three commercial activities that are being performed by an agency for examination; and

(2)  require the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget to conduct the examination.



Enacted by Chapter 147, 2008 General Session

